nb: Steppermotorbevegelsestype: Klatrestil; Lineær; Flerveis; Trappemaskin; Sving/3D; Twist/sideveis; V-formet; Vertikal; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de movimento de passo: Estilo escalador; Linear; Multidirecional; Máquina de escadas; Balanço/3D; Torção/lateral; Em forma de V; Vertical; Outro
pt-BR: Aparelho de step tipo de movimento: Estilo escalador; Linear; Multidirecional; Simulador de escada; Balanço/3D; Torção/lateral; Em V; Vertical; Outro
zh-CN: 踏步运动类型: 攀爬式; 直线型; 多向型; 楼梯机式; 摆动/3D 型; 扭腰/侧向型; V 型; 垂直型; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de mișcare pentru stepper: Stil alpinist; Liniară; Multidirecțională; Scară rulantă; Swing/3D; Răsucire/laterală; În formă de V; Verticală; Altele
vi: Loại chuyển động bước: Kiểu leo núi; Tuyến tính; Đa hướng; Kiểu máy leo cầu thang; Lắc lư/3D; Vặn mình/ngang; Hình chữ V; Dọc; Khác
fi: Stepperin liikkeen tyyppi: Kiipeilytyyli; Lineaarinen; Monisuuntainen; Porraskone; Keinuva / 3D; Kiertävä/sivuttainen; V-muotoinen; Pystysuuntainen; Muu
ja: ステッパーモーションタイプ: クライマースタイル; リニア; 多方向; ステップミル; スイング/3D; ツイスト/ラテラル; V字型; 垂直; その他
da: Bevægelsestype for stepper: Klatrestil; Lineær; Flervejs; Trappemaskine; Sving/3D; Twist/lateral; V-formet; Lodret; Andet
zh-TW: 踏步機運動類型: 攀岩式; 直線式; 多向式; 階梯機; 擺動/3D; 扭腰/側向; V 型; 垂直式; 其他
th: ประเภทการเคลื่อนที่แบบสเต็ปเปอร์: สไตล์ปีนเขา; แนวตรง; หลายทิศทาง; สเต็ปมิลล์; แกว่ง/3D; บิด/ด้านข้าง; รูปตัววี; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ ruchu steppera: Wspinaczkowy; Liniowy; Wielokierunkowy; Schody treningowe; Wychylny/3D; Skrętny/boczny; W kształcie V; Pionowy; Inny
ko: 스테퍼 동작 타입: 클라이머 스타일; 리니어; 다방향; 스텝 밀; 스윙/3D; 트위스트/래터럴; V자형; 수직형; 기타
tr: Stepper hareket tipi: Tırmanıcı stili; Doğrusal; Çok yönlü; Step değirmeni; Salınım/3D; Dönüşlü/yanal; V şeklinde; Dikey; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип движение на степера: Тип катерач; Линейно; Многопосочно; Тип стълба; Люлеене/3D; Усукване/странично; V-образно; Вертикално; Друго
en: Stepper motion type: Climber style; Linear; Multi-directional; Step mill; Swing/3D; Twist/lateral; V-shaped; Vertical; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta gibanja koračnega mehanizma: Slog plezanja; Linearno; Večsmerno; Stopniščni trenažer; Nihanje/3D; Zasuk/bočno; V-oblika; Vertikalno; Drugo
nl: Stepper bewegingstype: Klimmerstijl; Lineair; Multidirectioneel; Traploopband; Swing/3D; Twist/lateraal; V-vormig; Verticaal; Overig
it: Tipo di movimento a scatti: Stile climber; Lineare; Multidirezionale; Step mill; Oscillante/3D; Rotazione/laterale; A forma di V; Verticale; Altro
es: Tipo de movimiento paso a paso: Estilo escaladora; Lineal; Multidireccional; Máquina de escalones; Oscilante/3D; Torsión/lateral; En forma de V; Vertical; Otro
fr: Type de mouvement du stepper: Style grimpeur; Linéaire; Multidirectionnel; Escalator; Balancier/3D; Torsion/latéral; En forme de V; Vertical; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta koračnog Motion: Stil penjanja; Linearno; U više smjerova; Beskonačne stepenice; Njihanje / 3D; Rotacijsko / bočno; V-oblik; Okomito; Ostalo
cs: Typ krokového pohybu: Schodový (climber); Lineární; Vícesměrný; Eskalátorový; Kyvný / 3D; Twistový/boční; Ve tvaru V; Vertikální; Jiné
ru: Тип движения степпера: В виде скалолазания; Линейный; Многонаправленный; Эскалаторного типа; Качающийся/3D; Поворотный/боковой; V-образный; Вертикальный; Другое
lt-LT: Stepperio judesio tipas: Laipiojimo stiliaus; Linijinis; Daugiakryptis; Laiptų treniruoklis; Svyruojantis / 3D; Sukiojimosi / šoninis; V formos; Vertikalus; Kita
sv: Typ av rörelsemönster för stepper: Klättrarstil; Linjär; Flerriktad; Rullande trappa; Sving/3D; Vridning/lateral; V-formad; Vertikal; Övrigt
de: Bewegungsart des Steppers: Kletterstil; Linear; Multidirektional; Treppensteiger; Swing/3D; Twist/Lateral; V-förmig; Vertikal; Andere
sk-SK: Typ pohybu steppera: Horolezecký štýl; Lineárny; Viacsmerný; Schodový trenažér; Hojdavý/3D; Rotačný/bočný; V tvare V; Vertikálny; Iné
el: Τύπος κίνησης stepper: Στυλ αναρρίχησης; Γραμμική; Πολλαπλών κατευθύνσεων; Μηχάνημα σκαλιών (Step mill); Αιώρησης/3D; Περιστροφική/πλευρική; Σχήματος V; Κάθετη; Άλλο
hu: Taposógép mozgástípusa: Hegymászó stílusú; Lineáris; Többirányú; Lépcsőzőgép; Lengő/3D; Csavaró/oldalirányú; V-alakú; Függőleges; Egyéb